Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.] FUEL TANK ADVISORY
COMMITTEE

Note

Transfer of rights, powers, etc. of the task force to study
fuel tank leaks to the fuel tank advisory committee. L 2016, c 244, §3.

[§342L-61] Fuel tank advisory
committee; established; composition. (a) There is established in the
department of health the fuel tank advisory committee, which shall consist of up
to fourteen ex officio members and at least two public members.

(b) The ex officio members of the committee
shall be:

(1) The director of health, who shall serve as the
committee's chair;

(2) The four members of Hawaii's congressional
delegation, or their designees;

(3) The president of the Hawaii senate, or a senator appointed
by the president of the senate;

(4) The speaker of the Hawaii house of representatives,
or a representative appointed by the speaker of the house;

(5) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources, or the chairperson's designee;

(6) The chairperson of the board of water supply of a
county with a population of five hundred thousand or more, or the chairperson's
designee; and

(7) The chairperson of the commission on water
resource management, or the chairperson's designee.

(c) The following persons shall be invited to
participate on the advisory committee as ex officio members:

(1) The Commanding General of the United States Army,
Pacific, or the Commanding General's designee;

(2) The Commander of the Pacific Fleet of the United
States Navy, or the Commander's designee;

(3) The Commander of the Pacific Air Forces, or the Commander's
designee; and

(4) A representative from the United States
Environmental Protection Agency, or the representative's designee.

(d) The governor shall appoint at least two
public members from the community at large in accordance with section 26-34;
provided that the advice and consent of the senate shall not be necessary.

(e) The public members of the advisory
committee shall receive no salary, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for
necessary expenses, including travel expenses. [L 2016, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next